Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 6. Branch Banks Generally

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 1, also enacted an article 6 (§§

13-2-601

through
13-2-608) of chapter 2 of this title. That enactment has been redesignated as article 7 (§§

13-2-701

through

13-2-708

).

§§ 13-2-601 through 13-2-607.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 75, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from
Laws 1991, ch. 146, § 1, related to branch banking generally, and more specifically to licensing requirements, fees, permissible activities, record-keeping, and examinations, and further provided that branch banks were subject to the rules and regulations of the state banking commissioner.